Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2811.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-2402, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-2402. Obstructing governmental operations; classification A. A person commits obstructing governmental operations if, by using or threatening to use violence or physical force, such the person knowingly obstructs, impairs or hinders: 1. The performance of a governmental function by a public servant acting under color of his official authority; or 2. The enforcement of the penal law or the preservation of the peace by a peace officer acting under color of his official authority; or . 3. The making of a lawful arrest. B. This section does not apply to the obstruction, impairment or hinderance of the making of an arrest. C. B. Obstructing governmental operations pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section is a class 5 felony. Obstructing governmental operations pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1 or 2 of this section is a class 1 misdemeanor. END_STATUTE